apertium-lat.lat.dix
    <pardef n="/esse__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ero</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erimus</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eris</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eritis</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erit</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erunt</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuero</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerimus</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueris</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueritis</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerit</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerint</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>este</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esto</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>estote</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esto</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sunto</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fui</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuimus</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuisti</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuistis</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuit</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerunt</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esse</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuisse</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="infp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueram</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueramus</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueras</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueratis</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerat</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerant</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuissem</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuissemus</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuisses</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuissetis</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuisset</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuissent</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerim</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerimus</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueris</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueritis</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerit</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerint</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futuro</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futuri</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futuro</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futurum</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>future</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futurus</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futuris</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futurorum</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futuris</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futuros</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futuri</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>futuri</l>
          <r>esse<s n="vbser"/><s n="pfut"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>

    <e lm="esse"><i></i><par n="/esse__vbser"/></e>
